Washington statutes.
RCW 1.08.033

Reviser's office location.

The department of public institutions shall provide suitable office and storage space and facilities for the reviser and his or her staff at Olympia, at a location convenient to the legislature and to the state law library.

[ 2011 c 336 s 5; 1955 c 235 s 5; 1951 c 157 s 15.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: Powers and duties of department of public institutions relating to housing of state agencies were repealed by 1955 c 195 s 3 and the director of general administration was vested with these powers and duties in 1955 c 285 s 9. The director of general administration was renamed the director of enterprise services by 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 107.